lexc/adj/enhuadjfnmn.lexc
LEXICON Caseszeru
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§en        #;  ! on, en, ön, n Adj form, szerűen
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdj
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase;


Lexicon Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;


LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;
LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;


LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
  
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

Lexicon Tocase1
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possm;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurm;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famm;

LEXICON Possm
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famm;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famm;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famm;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famm;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famm;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famm;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famm;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famm;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famm;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famm;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famm;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famm;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famm;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famm;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famm;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famm;
LEXICON Plurm
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genm;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genm;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genm;
                            Genm1;

LEXICON Famm
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genm;
                       Genm1;

!Use Case of Tocase/Tocase1

LEXICON Genm
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
  
LEXICON Genm1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12e§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
							Ik;

Lexicon Ik
+Ik:^ik     Possik;
+Ik:^ik     Plurik;
+Ik:^ik     Famik;
            #;

LEXICON Possik
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famik;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famik;
LEXICON Plurik
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1e§k    Genik;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genik;
                            Genik;

LEXICON Famik
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genik;
                       Genik;

LEXICON Genik
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseik;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseik;
                       Caseik;
  

LEXICON Adj2num
lábfajta AddAdj;
LEXICON Adj
Otto-féle AddAdj;
ablatívuszféle AddAdj;
abroszféle AddAdj;
afféle AddAdj;
akantuszféle AddAdj;
akropoliszféle AddAdj;
alkatrészféle AddAdj;
alkotórészféle AddAdj;
alrészféle AddAdj;
alügyészféle AddAdj;
ananászféle AddAdj;
angoltapaszféle AddAdj;
araszféle AddAdj;
aszparáguszféle AddAdj;
asztaliteniszféle AddAdj;
autóbuszféle AddAdj;
bajuszféle AddAdj;
bambuszféle AddAdj;
barlangászféle AddAdj;
belgyógyászféle AddAdj;
besszféle AddAdj;
biokertészféle AddAdj;
bogarászféle AddAdj;
bolgárkertészféle AddAdj;
borgiszféle AddAdj;
borászféle AddAdj;
burgonyaszeszféle AddAdj;
buszféle AddAdj;
bámészféle AddAdj;
bónuszféle AddAdj;
bűvészféle AddAdj;
ceszféle AddAdj;
chipsféle AddAdj;
ciklopszféle AddAdj;
cirkuszféle AddAdj;
csauszféle AddAdj;
csenkeszféle AddAdj;
cserkeszféle AddAdj;
csillagászféle AddAdj;
csipeszféle AddAdj;
csipkedíszféle AddAdj;
csőszféle AddAdj;
degeszféle AddAdj;
derescsenkeszféle AddAdj;
diabéteszféle AddAdj;
difteritiszféle AddAdj;
dinoszauruszféle AddAdj;
doktoranduszféle AddAdj;
dropszféle AddAdj;
dzsesszféle AddAdj;
démoszféle AddAdj;
dögvészféle AddAdj;
eiszféle AddAdj;
ellenvoksféle AddAdj;
előrészféle AddAdj;
eposzféle AddAdj;
erdőcsőszféle AddAdj;
erkölcscsőszféle AddAdj;
erőművészféle AddAdj;
ethoszféle AddAdj;
euklászféle AddAdj;
ezredrészféle AddAdj;
fajkultuszféle AddAdj;
fakúszféle AddAdj;
falragaszféle AddAdj;
falszakaszféle AddAdj;
faszféle AddAdj;
fehéroroszféle AddAdj;
fejdíszféle AddAdj;
fejrészféle AddAdj;
feketepenészféle AddAdj;
felsőrészféle AddAdj;
fikuszféle AddAdj;
fineszféle AddAdj;
firkászféle AddAdj;
fiszféle AddAdj;
fityiszféle AddAdj;
fogászféle AddAdj;
folyószakaszféle AddAdj;
forraszféle AddAdj;
frontszakaszféle AddAdj;
fároszféle AddAdj;
fényképészféle AddAdj;
fókavadászféle AddAdj;
földrészféle AddAdj;
fülészféle AddAdj;
fürkészféle AddAdj;
főrészféle AddAdj;
fűrészféle AddAdj;
generalisszimuszféle AddAdj;
giszféle AddAdj;
gombászféle AddAdj;
grátiszféle AddAdj;
gyógyászféle AddAdj;
gépalkatrészféle AddAdj;
hajhászféle AddAdj;
hangyászféle AddAdj;
hatvanadrészfajta AddAdj;
hetedrészfajta AddAdj;
hidroglóbuszfajta AddAdj;
hiszfajta AddAdj;
hoszteszfajta AddAdj;
huszárbajuszfajta AddAdj;
hókuszpókuszfajta AddAdj;
imbiszfajta AddAdj;
isiászfajta AddAdj;
juhászfajta AddAdj;
kaktuszfajta AddAdj;
kanavászfajta AddAdj;
karácsonyikaktuszfajta AddAdj;
keretrészfajta AddAdj;
kilencvenedrészfajta AddAdj;
kisoroszfajta AddAdj;
kohászfajta AddAdj;
koleszfajta AddAdj;
koszfajta AddAdj;
krampuszfajta AddAdj;
kultuszféle AddAdj;
kutaszféle AddAdj;
kérészféle AddAdj;
kígyósziszféle AddAdj;
közgazdászféle AddAdj;
küszféle AddAdj;
lepkészféle AddAdj;
lueszféle AddAdj;
lángészféle AddAdj;
légtornászféle AddAdj;
lövészféle AddAdj;
magántapsféle AddAdj;
marhavészféle AddAdj;
meningitiszféle AddAdj;
metreszféle AddAdj;
milliomodrészféle AddAdj;
mumpszféle AddAdj;
mészféle AddAdj;
műszerészféle AddAdj;
nagycirkuszféle AddAdj;
negyvenedrészféle AddAdj;
neszféle AddAdj;
noteszféle AddAdj;
nyereséghajhászféle AddAdj;
nárciszféle AddAdj;
nörszféle AddAdj;
nőgyógyászféle AddAdj;
omnibuszféle AddAdj;
orvlövészféle AddAdj;
panaszféle AddAdj;
passzféle AddAdj;
penészféle AddAdj;
plebszféle AddAdj;
portikuszféle AddAdj;
propoliszféle AddAdj;
péniszféle AddAdj;
rakaszféle AddAdj;
reneszánszféle AddAdj;
ripszféle AddAdj;
rádiuszféle AddAdj;
részféle AddAdj;
sanszféle AddAdj;
sillabuszféle AddAdj;
solymászféle AddAdj;
sporthorgászféle AddAdj;
státuszféle AddAdj;
szabászféle AddAdj;
szegélydíszféle AddAdj;
szemészféle AddAdj;
szeánszféle AddAdj;
szobrászféle AddAdj;
szájpenészféle AddAdj;
századrészféle AddAdj;
szöszféle AddAdj;
szürkepenészféle AddAdj;
síféle AddAdj;
tapaszféle AddAdj;
tejdropszféle AddAdj;
teraszféle AddAdj;
testrészféle AddAdj;
tisztiügyészfajta AddAdj;
toposzfajta AddAdj;
triászfajta AddAdj;
támaszfajta AddAdj;
tífuszfajta AddAdj;
túszfajta AddAdj;
tűzvészfajta AddAdj;
vakszfajta AddAdj;
világrészfajta AddAdj;
voksfajta AddAdj;
vészfajta AddAdj;
zenészfajta AddAdj;
álbajuszfajta AddAdj;
árkuszszinuszfajta AddAdj;
éceszfajta AddAdj;
élvhajhászfajta AddAdj;
észfajta AddAdj;
ítészfajta AddAdj;
ötödrészfajta AddAdj;
útipoggyászfajta AddAdj;
